New Jersey, session 222, S2184.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.  a.  The Division of Disability Services in the Department of Human Services shall expand its Information and Referral Services helpline to support individuals in planning visits to State or county public facilities by coordinating necessary accommodations for in-person appointments or engagements.  The staff of the expanded helpline shall: (1) provide information on what State and county public facilities have installed disability ramps and assist in navigating and connecting individuals to sign language interpreters, hearing loop technology, and other accessibility aids that are available at such facilities; (2) provide information on policies related to service animals; (3) address questions or complaints concerning accessibility challenges; and (4) offer guidance for planning visits, navigating public spaces, and understanding rights and available resources. b.  State and county public facilities shall designate an existing office to oversee visit accommodations arranged through the hotline.  Designated offices will be accessible to hotline staff to assist with the on-site coordination of requested disability accommodations.  The contact information for the designated offices shall also be made publicly available. c.  The Division of Disability Services shall consult with State and county agencies to determine what information and assistance would be necessary to provide on the expanded helpline, as well as to develop strategies for publicizing the helpline to ensure that individuals who require access to State and county public facilities are aware of and can utilize the service effectively. 2.  There is appropriated $100,000 to the Division of Disability Services to implement the provisions of this act. 3.  This act shall take effect on the first day of the sixth month next following the date of the enactment.